Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB689.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 222 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 222. Work-Hours and Leaves.--* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 (e) In the event of an office closure of a department, board or commission that is related to a declaration by the Governor of disaster emergency under 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301(c) (relating to general authority of Governor) or is caused by other exigent circumstances beyond the control of the department, board or commission, the following shall apply:(1) Subject to paragraph (4), if the office closure prevents an employe of the department, board or commission from performing duties for at least five consecutive business days, the employe shall be placed on unpaid leave until such time as the employe is able to resume regular duties or any substantially similar alternative duties provided by the department, board or commission with which the employe is employed.(2) An employe placed on unpaid leave under paragraph (1) shall retain, during the period of unpaid leave, any fringe benefits to which the employe is entitled as a result of employment with the department, board or commission.(3) An employe placed on unpaid leave under paragraph (1) may elect to use any of the employe's accrued paid leave benefits in lieu of unpaid leave during the time that the employe is prevented from performing the duties described under paragraph (1). If the employe exhausts the accrued paid leave, the employe shall be placed on unpaid leave.(4) This subsection shall not apply to an employe who is:(i) able to perform the duties described under paragraph (1) at the usual work location, through telework or at an alternative location; or(ii) furloughed indefinitely.(5) The status of an employe placed on unpaid leave under 20250HB0689PN0705 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this subsection or the retention of fringe benefits shall not be construed to impact the eligibility of the employe who is otherwise eligible for unemployment compensation benefits under the a ct of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law.(6) For purposes of this subsection, the term "fringe benefits":(i) Means the following:(A) All monetary employer payments to provide benefits under an employe benefit plan, as defined in 29 U.S.C. § 1002(3) (relating to definition of the term employee benefit plan).(B) Reimbursement for expenses.(C) Any other amount to be paid pursuant to an agreement to the employe, a third party or fund for the benefit of employes.(ii) Does not include accrued paid leave benefits.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0689PN0705 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516